New Jersey, session 221, S3047.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  1[The Commissioner of Health shall require every hospital in the State, every] Every1 birthing center licensed in the State pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), every federally qualified health center, and every 1[physician or] licensed1 health care practitioner 1[in the State]1 providing 1prenatal1 care to a pregnant person 1,1 or 1postpartum care to1 a person who 1[has given] seeks treatment within 12 weeks of giving1 birth, 1[to screen] shall adopt and adhere to policies requiring1 the person 1to be evaluated, as necessary,1 for 1[preeclampsia] hypertensive disorders related to pregnancy, including, but not limited to, postpartum preeclampsia and hypertension,1 if the person shows symptoms of the condition 1and has not in the current or recent pregnancy previously been diagnosed with the condition or after the onset of such symptoms1. 1[Screening] Evaluation1 tools shall be based on 1[industry]1 best practices and guidance, as determined by the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or another nationally-recognized body 1[as may be designated by the commissioner]1. b.    1[A hospital, a licensed] Every1 birthing center 1licensed in the State pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.)1, 1[or a] every1 federally qualified health center 1[providing care to]1, 1[or a physician or other] and every licensed1 health care practitioner 1[who is the primary caregiver for,] providing prenatal care to1 a pregnant person 1,1 or 1postpartum care to1 a person who seeks treatment within 1[six] 121 weeks of giving birth, shall, in accordance with 1[guidelines developed by the commissioner] nationally recognized evidence-based treatment practices1: (1)   provide the person with 1evidence-based1 information on 1[preeclampsia] hypertensive disorders related to pregnancy preeclampsia, including, but not limited to, postpartum preeclampsia and hypertension1 and potential warning signs and symptoms 1[through the educational program developed pursuant subsection d. of this section]1; (2)   inform the person of the benefits of being 1[screened] evaluated1 for 1[preeclampsia] hypertensive disorders related to pregnancy preeclampsia, including, but not limited to, postpartum preeclampsia and hypertension,1 if the person shows symptoms of 1[the condition] any such disorders1, and that the person 1[is required to] should1 be 1[screened] evaluated1 for 1[preeclampsia] hypertensive disorders related to pregnancy under the circumstances set forth in this section1 unless the person 1[issues a written refusal] declines1 to be 1[screened, which refusal shall be provided on a form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner consistent with the provisions of subsection c. of this section] evaluated1; 1and1 1[(3) screen the person for preeclampsia unless the person provides written refusal as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection. The person shall, on the form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner consistent with subsection c. of this section, acknowledge receipt of the information provided by the hospital, birthing center, federally qualified health center, physician, or health care practitioner, as applicable, regarding the benefits of being screened for preeclampsia; and (4)   encourage the person to routinely engage in home blood pressure monitoring. c.     The commissioner shall develop a standardized form to be used for the purposes of providing the acknowledgement required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection b. of this section, which may also be used to provide written refusal to undergo a screening for preeclampsia pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section, if applicable hypertensive disorders related to pregnancy preeclampsia, including but not limited to postpartum preeclampsia and hypertension. d.    The commissioner shall develop, in consultation with the Preeclampsia Foundation and any other community-based organization as may be designated by the commissioner, a preeclampsia educational program for pregnant individuals and individuals who have recently given birth.  The educational program shall include information on preeclampsia and the potential warning signs and symptoms of preeclampsia. e.     Upon] (3)  upon1 receipt of the results of any 1[screening] evaluation1 conducted pursuant to 1[subsection a. of this section, the hospital, licensed or birthing center, federally qualified health center, or physician or health care practitioner, as applicable, shall] this section,1 discuss the results with the person and, if the person has a positive 1[screening] evaluation1 for preeclampsia, develop 1[a] an evidence-based1 treatment plan to minimize the persons risk from preeclampsia. 2.    The Commissioner of Health 1[, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410  (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall] may1 adopt rules and regulations 1, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary1 to effectuate the purposes of this act 1, and the State Board of Medical Examiners, and any other agency or board that regulates health care practitioners subject to the requirements of section 1 of this act, shall promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act1. 3.    This act shall take effect 1[immediately] 180 days following enactment1.